Utah statutes.
39-6-110.   Fines.

(1)  Fines may be paid to a military court or to an officer executing its process.  The amount of the fine may be noted upon any state roll or account for pay of the delinquent and deducted from any pay or allowance due or to become due to him, until the fine is completely paid.

(2)  Any sum deducted shall be turned in to the military court which imposed the fine and shall be paid by the officer receiving it under the same procedure as for fines and other money collected under a sentence of a military court.

(3)  A fine or penalty imposed by a military court upon an officer or enlisted person shall be paid by the officer collecting it to the state General Fund, within 30 days.



Enacted by Chapter 210, 1988 General Session

